Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202080-317
Nebraska veterans homes; Veterans' Homes Board; rules of membership; application.

The Veterans' Homes Board shall prescribe rules of membership in the Nebraska veterans homes in accordance with the Nebraska Veterans Services Act. An application for membership in a Nebraska veterans home shall be made to a county veterans service officer, to a recognized veterans organization as defined in subdivision (1) of section 80-401.01, or to a Nebraska veterans home, and such officer, organization, or Nebraska veterans home shall coordinate the required financial and medical information and, if necessary, provide an opinion regarding its validity. The county veterans service officer, recognized veterans organization, or Nebraska veterans home shall at once forward the application together with a finding in regard to the condition of the applicant to the board, whose duty it is to receive, review, and act upon applications for membership. During the interim between meetings of the board, the secretary of the board is authorized to adjudicate applications, subject to the approval of the full board at its next meeting.

Laws 1887, c. 82, § 1, p. 622;

Laws 1889, c. 85, § 1, p. 569;

Laws 1891, c. 49, § 1, p. 340;

Laws 1901, c. 71, § 1, p. 458;

R.S.1913, § 7302;

Laws 1919, c. 157, § 1, p. 354;

C.S.1922, § 6957;

C.S.1929, § 80-301;

Laws 1931, c. 153, § 1, p. 412;

Laws 1935, c. 172, § 1, p. 627;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 80-301;

Laws 1943, c. 211, § 1, p. 696;

R.S.1943, § 80-301;

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 1, p. 891;

Laws 1953, c. 325, § 1, p. 1075;

Laws 1959, c. 421, § 1, p. 1417;

Laws 1969, c. 753, § 1, p. 2833;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 93, p. 2402;

Laws 1971, LB 334, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 33, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 90, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 64, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-302;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 720;

Laws 2012, LB795, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 6.